Hawaii statutes.
§706-624.5 Notice of probation. (1)
Whenever the court places a defendant convicted of an offense against the
person as described in chapter 707, or of an attempt to commit such an offense
on probation without requiring the serving of a term of imprisonment, the court
shall provide written notice to each victim of such offense of the probation,
whenever the victim has made a written request for such notice. Notice shall
be given to the victim at the address given on the request for notice or such
other address as may be provided to the court by the victim from time to time.

(2) Neither the failure of any state officer
or employee to carry out the requirements of this section nor compliance with
it shall subject the State or the officer or employee to liability in any civil
action. However, such failure may provide a basis for such disciplinary action
as may be deemed appropriate by competent authority. [L 1983, c 184, §2(1); am
L 1986, c 314, §26]

Cross References

Notice of escape, see §706-673.

Rights of victims and witnesses in criminal proceedings, see
chapter 801D.

COMMENTARY ON §706-624.5

Act 184, Session Laws 1983, added this section to require
notification to a crime victim if a defendant who harmed the victim is released
into the community after conviction. This addition was intended to insure that
crime victims "are treated with fairness and respect" and that
agencies in the criminal justice system cooperate with each other to provide
information and other help to crime victims. House Conference Committee Report
No. 46.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next